Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB314.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1505(a) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1505. Death of registrant.(a) Department of Health.--A commission shall cancel the registration of a registered elector reported dead by the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall, within [60] seven days of receiving notice of the death of an individual 18 years of age or older, send the name and address of residence of that individual to a commission in a manner and on a form prescribed by the department. The commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0314PN0248 - 2 - 1